District of Columbia statutes.
9-923

Procurement exemption.

In light of the multi-jurisdictional nature of the Authority, an exemption is provided to the Authority from all laws and regulations of the District governing public procurement.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 24, 32 DCR 6093

History

1981 Ed., § 7-1273.

Prior Codifications